Louisiana, session 2026, HB145.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:1533(A)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1533. Self-Insurance Fund
A.
* * *
(3) Payment for extraordinary medical and dental expenses for law
enforcement officers and firemen as provided for in R.S. 40:1668.1 shall be made by
the office of risk management on behalf of the Law Enforcement Officers and
Firemen's Survivor Benefit Review Board as a result of a specific appropriation
received for that purpose.
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 145 ENROLLED
Section 2. The heading of Chapter 7-C of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:1668.1 is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
CHAPTER 7-C. FIREMEN AND LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS -
DISABILITY BENEFITS - EXTRAORDINARY MEDICAL AND DENTAL EXPENSES
* * *
§1668.1. Payment for extraordinary medical and dental expenses for firemen and
law enforcement officers
A. It is hereby declared to be the public policy of this state, under its police
power, to provide for certain extraordinary medical and dental expenses for firemen
and law enforcement officers determined to be injured as the direct and proximate
result of an injury arising out of and in the course of the performance of their official
duties.
B. As used in this Section, the following words have the following
meanings:
(1) "Board" means the Law Enforcement Officers and Firemen's Survivor
Benefit Review Board created and provided for in R.S. 40:1665.3.
(2) "Extraordinary medical and dental expenses" means any of the following:
(a) Medical expenses of the injured employee not covered by workers'
compensation coverage or by the health insurance plan provided by the employer.
(b) Dental expenses of the injured employee not covered by workers'
compensation coverage or by the health insurance plan provided by the employer.
(3) "Law enforcement officer" includes the following:
(a) All sheriffs and deputy sheriffs in the state employed on a full-time basis.
(b) All members of the state police employed on a full-time basis.
(c) All municipal police officers in the state employed on a full-time basis.
(d) All university and college police officers at state universities and colleges
employed on a full-time basis.
(4) "Officer" includes firemen as defined in R.S. 40:1665 and law
enforcement officers as defined in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 145 ENROLLED
C. In any case in which an officer is injured as the direct and proximate
result of an injury arising out of and in the course of the performance of their official
duties, the state risk director shall pay, as provided by R.S. 39:1533(A)(3), on behalf
of the officer any extraordinary medical and dental expenses incurred as determined
by the board.
D.(1) The board shall hear and decide by unanimous vote all claims for
extraordinary medical and dental expenses within sixty days after documentation is
received. The board may request any information necessary to make a determination
of eligibility for the payment of such expenses.
(2) Within ten days after the board has reached its decision, it shall send
notice of its decision to the officer by certified mail. If the board denies the claim,
the officer shall have one year from the date of denial to file suit against the state
through the board in the parish where the incident that brought about the injury
occurred. The date of denial shall be calculated as one year from the date of receipt
of the decision from the board.
E. If the board determines the officer qualifies for the benefit payable under
this Section, the board shall notify the state risk director.
F. The maximum benefit payable shall be twenty-five thousand dollars per
injury per officer.
G. No benefit shall be payable pursuant to this Section if any of the
following applies:
(1) The injury was caused by the intentional misconduct of the officer or by
the officer's intention to bring about his death, disability, or injury.
(2) The officer was voluntarily intoxicated at the time of his injury.
(3) The officer was performing his duties in a grossly negligent manner at
the time of his injury.
H. The board may adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions
of this Section.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 145 ENROLLED
I. The provisions of this Section shall be applicable to extraordinary medical
or dental expenses incurred due to an injury arising out of and in the course of the
performance of an officer's duties on or after January 1, 2023.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.